Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-925
Polls; disturbing elections prohibited; arrest.

If any person conducts himself or herself in a noisy, riotous, or tumultuous manner at or about the polls so as to disturb the election or insults or abuses the precinct or district inspectors or judges or clerks of election and persists in such conduct after being warned to desist, any election commissioner, county clerk, inspector, judge of election, police officer, or sheriff shall arrest him or her without warrant and bring him or her before the county court. Such person shall be permitted to vote if he or she is a registered voter.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 268.